Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-3553
Depreciation
funds, authorized; limitations on use.

Nothing
contained in the Nebraska Local
Hospital District Act and sections 23-3501 to 23-3519 shall
be construed to prohibit the board of trustees of any facility established under section 23-3501 or a local hospital district
from establishing depreciation funds from patient or other revenue income
for the purpose of replacing equipment or providing for future improvements
or additions or from using such patient or other revenue income for purchasing
equipment or for retiring indebtedness incurred for improvements or additions
not financed by bonds of the county or direct tax levies. The limitations
upon expenditures provided for in section 23-3508
shall not apply to expenditures made from patient or other revenue income
or for the retiring of indebtedness or payment of other obligations from such
patient or revenue income.

Laws 1965, c. 95, § 1, p. 411;

Laws 1967, c. 121, § 17, p. 395;

Laws 1991, LB 798, § 5;

R.S.Supp.,1991, § 23-343.48;

Laws 1992, LB 1240, § 23;

Laws 2012, LB995, § 12.
April 6, 2012
Nebraska Local Hospital District Act, see section 23-3528.